Illinois, session 104th, SB2000.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Student Debt Assistance Act is amended by 5changing Sections 5 and 35 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 66/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act:8    "Debt" means any money, obligation, claim, or sum due or 9owing or alleged to be due or owing from a student to an 10institution of higher education. "Debt" does not include the 11fee, if any, that is charged to students by an applicable 12provider for the actual cost of providing an academic 13transcript to a student.14    "Institution of higher education" or "institution" means 15any publicly or privately operated university, college, 16community college, business, technical, or vocational school, 17or other educational institution in this State offering 18degrees and instruction beyond the secondary school level. 19includes, but is not limited to, an institution to which the 20Private Business and Vocational Schools Act of 2012 or the 21Private College Act applies and a public institution of higher 22education included in the definition of "public institutions 23of higher education" under the Board of Higher Education Act.   SB2000- 2 -LRB104 10578 LNS 20654 b1"Institution of higher education" or "institution" also 2includes a person engaged in the business of providing 3postsecondary education, via correspondence or online or in 4this State, to an individual located in this State, regardless 5of whether the person has obtained authorization from the 6Board of Higher Education to operate in this State or is 7accredited.8    "Official transcript" means the academic transcript or a 9similar academic record of each current or former student of 10an institution of higher education that is deemed official, 11authenticated, certified, or bona fide and that contains 12information customarily provided on an official academic 13transcript, including, but not limited to, courses taken, 14terms, grades, degrees or credentials conferred, and any other 15similar information. 16    "Unofficial transcript" means the academic transcript or a 17similar academic record of each current or former student of 18an institution of higher education that contains information 19customarily provided on an official transcript, but cannot be 20used to transfer academic credits to another institution of 21higher education. 22(Source: P.A. 102-998, eff. 5-27-22.) 23    (110 ILCS 66/35)24    Sec. 35. Reporting. On or before July 1, 2024 and on or 25before each July 1 thereafter, each institution of higher   SB2000- 3 -LRB104 10578 LNS 20654 b1education shall report to either the Board of Higher Education 2or the Illinois Community College Board, whichever is 3appropriate, information regarding financial-based transcript 4and registration holds, which must include:5        (1) reporting the institution of higher education's 6    policy developed pursuant to Section 30 of this Act; and 7        (2) reporting the number of students for whom the 8    institution of higher education has withheld official 9    transcripts, diplomas, or registration privileges, using 10    data from the previous academic year; .11        (3) reporting the amount of student debt owed to the 12    institution, number of students,and amounts written off, 13    over certain time periods, as specified by the Board of 14    Higher Education;15        (4) reporting the number of students with outstanding 16    debt whose transcripts were released and the amount of the 17    debt, the number of students with outstanding debt whose 18    diplomas were released and the amount of the outstanding 19    debt, and the number of students with outstanding debt 20    whose transcripts were withheld because the request for 21    release was not for a purpose outlined in this Act and the 22    amount of outstanding debt; and23        (5) reporting the total number of students whose 24    registration privileges are being withheld for financial 25    reasons, the amount of outstanding debt for those students 26    and the total portion of that debt that has been written   SB2000- 4 -LRB104 10578 LNS 20654 b1    off for accounting purposes but the registration hold 2    remains.3(Source: P.A. 103-54, eff. 6-9-23.)